Utah statutes.
53A-11-205.   Notification to the parent of an injured or sick child.

(1)  A public school shall notify the custodial parent and, if requested in writing by a noncustodial parent, make reasonable efforts to notify the noncustodial parent of a student who is injured or becomes ill at the school during the regular school day if:

(a)  the injury or illness requires treatment at a hospital, doctor's office, or other medical facility not located on the school premises; and

(b)  the school has received a current telephone number for the party it is required to notify or make reasonable efforts to notify.

(2) (a)  Subsection (1) does not apply to a noncustodial parent forbidden to have contact with the student under a court order or similar procedure.

(b)  The custodial parent is responsible for providing the school with the noncustodial parent's status under Subsection (2)(a) through a procedure adopted by the local school board.

